Missouri, session 2026, SB1573.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 210.670, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 210.670,
to read as follows:
210.670. 1. Children in foster care under the
responsibility of the state who have attained the age of
fourteen shall be consulted in the development of, revision
of, or addition to their case plan.
2. The children may choose individuals to participate
as members of the family support team. The division may
reject members chosen by the child if the division has good
cause to believe the individual would not act in the best
interests of the child. The child may designate one member
to be his or her advisor and, as necessary, advocate with
respect to the application of the reasonable and prudent
parent standard to the child.
3. The child shall receive:
(1) A document which describes the rights of the child
with respect to education, health, visitation, court
participation, the child's right to documents pursuant to
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1573 2
subsection 4 of this section, and the child's right to stay
safe and avoid exploitation; and
(2) A signed acknowledgment by the child indicating he
or she has been provided with a copy of the document, and
the child's rights contained in the document have been
explained to the child in an age- and developmentally
appropriate manner.
4. If a child is leaving foster care by reason of
having attained eighteen years of age or such greater age as
the state has elected, the division shall provide the child
[with] the following:
(1) An official or certified copy of his or her United
States birth certificate[,];
(2) A Social Security card issued by the Commissioner
of Social Security[,];
(3) Health insurance information[,];
(4) A copy of the child's medical records[, and];
(5) A driver's license or identification card issued
by the state[,];
(6) Written information on how to access the child's
medical records and court documents;
(7) A letter confirming the child's prior foster care
status for purposes of program eligibility;
(8) Contact information for relevant social service
agencies; and
(9) A summary of available state and federal programs
and supports, including, but not limited to, health
coverage, housing assistance, and postfoster care services,
unless the child has been in foster care for less than six
months and unless the child is ineligible to receive such
documents.

SB 1573 3
5. If guardianship is deemed the permanency plan or is
being considered by the court, the division or the division
of youth services shall include any proposed or nominated
guardian for the child, including a public administrator, in
the development of the permanency plan at least six months
prior to the child leaving foster care or state custody by
reason of having attained eighteen years of age or such
greater age as the state has elected. The proposed or
nominated guardian shall receive a copy of the proposed
permanency plan from the division or the division of youth
services. The proposed or nominated guardian shall also
receive a copy of any documents, records, or other
information provided to the child under subsection 4 of this
section prior to the child leaving foster care or state
custody.
✓